apertium-dsb.dsb.metadix
    <!-- Metapardefs -->
    <pardef n="jabłukow/a [mě]zga__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a</r>
        </p>
        <i><b/><prm/></i>
        <p>
          <l>zga</l>
          <r>zga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eje</l>
          <r>a</r>
        </p>
        <i><b/><prm/></i>
        <p>
          <l>zgi</l>
          <r>zga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ej</l>
          <r>a</r>
        </p>
        <i><b/><prm/></i>
        <p>
          <l>zdze</l>
          <r>zga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>a</r>
        </p>
        <i><b/><prm/></i>
        <p>
          <l>zgu</l>
          <r>zga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eju</l>
          <r>a</r>
        </p>
        <i><b/><prm/></i>
        <p>
          <l>zgu</l>
          <r>zga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ej</l>
          <r>a</r>
        </p>
        <i><b/><prm/></i>
        <p>
          <l>zdze</l>
          <r>zga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ej</l>
          <r>a</r>
        </p>
        <i><b/><prm/></i>
        <p>
          <l>zdze</l>
          <r>zga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eju</l>
          <r>a</r>
        </p>
        <i><b/><prm/></i>
        <p>
          <l>zgowu</l>
          <r>zga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yma</l>
          <r>a</r>
        </p>
        <i><b/><prm/></i>
        <p>
          <l>zgoma</l>
          <r>zga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ej</l>
          <r>a</r>
        </p>
        <i><b/><prm/></i>
        <p>
          <l>zdze</l>
          <r>zga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yma</l>
          <r>a</r>
        </p>
        <i><b/><prm/></i>
        <p>
          <l>zgoma</l>
          <r>zga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yma</l>
          <r>a</r>
        </p>
        <i><b/><prm/></i>
        <p>
          <l>zgoma</l>
          <r>zga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a</r>
        </p>
        <i><b/><prm/></i>
        <p>
          <l>zgi</l>
          <r>zga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ych</l>
          <r>a</r>
        </p>
        <i><b/><prm/></i>
        <p>
          <l>zgow</l>
          <r>zga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ym</l>
          <r>a</r>
        </p>
        <i><b/><prm/></i>
        <p>
          <l>zgam</l>
          <r>zga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a</r>
        </p>
        <i><b/><prm/></i>
        <p>
          <l>zgi</l>
          <r>zga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ymi</l>
          <r>a</r>
        </p>
        <i><b/><prm/></i>
        <p>
          <l>zgami</l>
          <r>zga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ych</l>
          <r>a</r>
        </p>
        <i><b/><prm/></i>
        <p>
          <l>zgach</l>
          <r>zga<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kó/ń__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nja</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njoju</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nja</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nju</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njom</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ń</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njowu</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njoma</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nja</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njoma</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njoma</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nja</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njow</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njam</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nje</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njach</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njami</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nje</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="kóń"><i>kó</i><par n="kó/ń__n"/></e>
